Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6158.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-68.1. Mandatory coverage for scalp cooling systems.
(a) Every individual or group hospital or medical expense insurance policy or individual
or group hospital or medical services plan contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this
state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage to individuals diagnosed with breast cancer
and undergoing chemotherapy treatments for scalp cooling systems to preserve hair during
chemotherapy treatments.
(b) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service

Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-59.1. Mandatory coverage for scalp cooling systems.
(a) Every individual or group hospital or medical expense insurance policy or individual
or group hospital or medical services plan contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this
state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage to individuals diagnosed with breast cancer
and undergoing chemotherapy treatments for scalp cooling systems to preserve hair during
chemotherapy treatments.
(b) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident, or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-54.1. Mandatory coverage for scalp cooling systems.
(a) Every individual or group hospital or medical expense insurance policy or individual
or group hospital or medical services plan contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this
state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage to individuals diagnosed with breast cancer
and undergoing chemotherapy treatments for scalp cooling systems to preserve hair during
chemotherapy treatments.
(b) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident, or both; and
LC002437 - Page 2 of 4

(9) Other limited benefit policies.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-71.1. Mandatory coverage for scalp cooling systems.
(a) Every individual or group hospital or medical expense insurance policy or individual
or group hospital or medical services plan contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this
state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage to individuals diagnosed with breast cancer
and undergoing chemotherapy treatments for scalp cooling systems to preserve hair during
chemotherapy treatments.
(b) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident, or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002437
========
LC002437 - Page 3 of 4